Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.071

Degree program support—Change from state funding to self-supporting and fee-based.

(1) When a decision is being considered to change an existing degree program that is supported by state funding to a program that is self-supporting and fee-based, the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall:

(a) Publicly notify prospective students, including notification in admission offers with an estimate of tuition and fees;

(b) Notify enrolled students and undergraduate or graduate student government associations at least six months before implementation with an estimate of tuition and fees; and

(c) Allow students currently enrolled in the program to continue in the state-supported program structure for a consecutive amount of time no greater than four years in length.

(2)(a) The state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall each establish or designate a committee comprised of administrators, faculty, and students to create criteria upon which to evaluate, prior to a shift being made, the proposed shift of a degree program from a state-supported degree program to a self-supporting funding basis. Where possible, an existing budget or advisory committee shall be designated instead of establishing a new committee. When establishing evaluation criteria, the committee shall consider including the following:

(i) The financial health and sustainability of the program;

(ii) If moving the program to a self-supporting funding basis alters the availability of student financial aid;

(iii) The audience for the program, the format of the program, and the institutional priority for state funding of the program;

(iv) Demographics of students served and graduates practicing in typical fields of study; and

(v) Alternatives to shifting to a self-supporting funding basis including raising tuition within the state-funded context or program elimination.

(b) The committee that creates the criteria for moving a degree from a state-supported degree program to a self-supporting funding basis may also establish a process to periodically evaluate programs that have shifted from a state-supported program to a fee-based funding model for alignment with criteria established.

[ 2014 c 60 s 1.]